Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-613
Person eligible to file petition.

A petition under section 30-608 or 30-612 may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The individual;

(2) The surrogate;

(3) The spouse, parent, sibling, or child of the individual who is an adult or an emancipated minor;

(4) A close friend of the individual who is an adult or an emancipated minor;

(5) The primary health care provider or another health care provider; or

(6) Any other interested party.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 13.